Utah statutes.
77-7-17.   Authority of peace officer to take possession of weapons.
A peace officer who finds a dangerous weapon pursuant to a frisk may take and
keep it until the completion of the questioning, at which time he shall either
return it if lawfully possessed, or arrest such person.
